Hawaii statutes.
[§346-363] Exception to liability for
donors. (a) Any donor who gives money to a provider agency, to a homeless
facility to or through the department, or for any other program for the
homeless authorized by this part shall not be liable for any civil damages
resulting from the donation.

(b) Any donor who gives land and improvements,
or who leases land and improvements at a nominal consideration, to a provider
agency, to a homeless facility to or through the department, or for any other
program for the homeless authorized by this part shall not be liable for any
civil damages resulting from the donation, except as may result from the donor's
gross negligence or wanton acts or omissions; provided that if the donor at the
time of donation gave the department a full disclosure of all the dangers
concerning the land and improvements known to the donor, the donor shall not be
liable for any civil damages resulting from the donation.

(c) Any donor who, in good faith and without
remuneration or expectation of remuneration, provides services or materials
used to build and construct a facility for the homeless, or who renovates,
repairs, or maintains an existing or acquired facility for the homeless, or who
provides shelter to homeless persons, shall not be liable for any civil damages
resulting from the donor's acts or omissions, except for damages resulting from
the donor's gross negligence relating to the donation.

(d) The department shall be responsible for
inspecting, reviewing, analyzing, qualifying, and determining that the land,
structures, materials, or services donated to the department for use by the
department in facilities for the homeless are reasonably safe for public use.
[L 2010, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next